Louisiana, session 2026, HB1051.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
10 Section 1. R.S. 33:4754.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
11 §4754.1. Dilapidated property; fire damage; insurance payment; demolition
12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in the city of
13 Shreveport, if a commercial property owner has received an insurance payment for
14 damage to his property that was caused by a fire and the property has become
15 dilapidated and presents a danger to the health and welfare of the residents of the
16 city, as determined by the governing authority of the city of Shreveport, after
17 consideration of reports or findings from the code enforcement office, fire
18 department, police department, and any other relevant public safety officials, the
19 property owner shall demolish the structure on the property.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1051 ENROLLED
1 Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be applied retroactively to January 1,
2 2023, as well as prospectively.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.